Tennessee, session 114, SB2314.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 67-6-228(a), is amended by deleting
the subsection and substituting instead the following:
(a) Notwithstanding this chapter to the contrary, except as otherwise provided in
subsections (b) and (c), the retail sale of food and food ingredients shall not be taxed.
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 67-6-228, is amended by adding the
following language as a new subsection (c):
Notwithstanding § 67-6-702(a) to the contrary, food and food ingredients are
taxable under part 7 of this chapter.
SECTION 3. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 67-6-103(c)(2), is amended by
deleting the following language:
Revenue generated from one-half percent (0.5%) of the tax rate provided in § 67-6-228
shall continue to be deposited in the state general fund and earmarked for education
purposes in kindergarten through grade twelve (K-12) regardless of whether the tax rate
provided in § 67-6-228 is reduced below six percent (6%).
SECTION 4. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 67-6-329(a), is amended by adding
the following as a new, appropriately designated subdivision:
( ) Food and food ingredients;
SECTION 5. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 67-6-329(a)(18), is amended by
deleting the language "or food and food ingredients".
SB2314
011528
- 1 -

SECTION 6. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 67-6-229, is amended by deleting the
language "food and food ingredients or".
SECTION 7. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 57-3-802(1), is amended by deleting
the language "that derives at least twenty percent (20%) of its sales taxable sales from the retail
sale of food and food ingredients for human consumption taxed at the rate provided in § 67-6-
228(a)" and substituting instead the language "that derives at least twenty percent (20%) of its
sales from the retail sale of food and food ingredients for human consumption".
SECTION 8. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 57-3-806(d)(1), is amended by
deleting the language "must maintain a minimum of twenty percent (20%) of the licensee's sales
taxable sales from the retail sale of food and food ingredients for human consumption taxed at
the rate provided in § 67-6-228(a)" and substituting instead the language "must maintain a
minimum of twenty percent (20%) of the licensee's sales from the retail sale of food and food
ingredients for human consumption".
SECTION 9. This act takes effect July 1, 2026, the public welfare requiring it.
- 2 - 011528